test/src/morphology/V-tosj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - тось: # Verb 'to come' - partial paradigm
  
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: тодмʼ
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: тон
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: то
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: тониʼ
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: тодиʼ
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тоӈахаʼ
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: товаˮ
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: тодаˮ
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тоˮ
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: тодамзь
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: тонась
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тось
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: тонинзь
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: тодинзь
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тоӈаханзь
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: товаць
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: тодаць
     тось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тоць
     тось+V+IV+Hort+ScSg1: тоходмʼ
     тось+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2: туˮ
     тось+V+IV+Opt+ScSg3: тоя
     тось+V+IV+Hort+ScDu1: тохониʼ
     тось+V+IV+Imprt+ScDu2: тодиʼ
     тось+V+IV+Opt+ScDu3: тояхаʼ
     тось+V+IV+Hort+ScPl1: тоховаˮ
     тось+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2: тодаˮ 
     тось+V+IV+Opt+ScPl3: тояˮ
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: тоидмʼ
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: тоин
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: тои
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: тоиниʼ
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: тоидиʼ
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: тоихиʼ
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: тоиваˮ
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: тоидаˮ
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: тоиˮ
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: тоидамзь
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: тоинась
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: тоись
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: тоининзь
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: тоидинзь
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: тоихинзь
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: тоиваць
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: тоидаць
     тось+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: тоиць
     тось+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg1: тобцудмʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg2: тобцун
     тось+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg3: тобцу
     тось+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu1: тобцуниʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu2: тобцудиʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu3: тобцухуʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl1: тобцуваˮ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl2: тобцудаˮ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl3: тобцуˮ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg1: тосадмʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg2: тосан
     тось+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg3: тоса
     тось+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu1: тосаниʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu2: тосадиʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu3: тосахаʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl1: тосаваˮ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl2: тосадаˮ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl3: тосаˮ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: товэдмʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: товэн
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: товы
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: товэниʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: товэдиʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: товэхэʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: товэваˮ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: товэдаˮ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: товыˮ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: товэдамзь
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: товэнась
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: товысь
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: товэнинзь
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: товэдинзь
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: товэхэнзь
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: товэваць
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: товэдаць
     тось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: товыць
     тось+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg1: тобцакэдмʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg2: тобцакэн
     тось+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg3: тобцакы
     тось+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu1: тобцакэниʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu2: тобцакэдиʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu3: тобцакэхэʼ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl1: тобцакэваˮ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl2: тобцакэдаˮ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl3: тобцакыˮ
     тось+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1: [тонакэдмʼ, тодакэдмʼ]
     тось+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2: [тонакэн, тодакэн]
     тось+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3: [тонакы, тадакы]
     тось+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1: [тонакэниʼ, тодакэниʼ]
     тось+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2: [тонакэдиʼ, тодакэдиʼ]
     тось+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3: [тонакэхаʼ, тодакэхаʼ]
     тось+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1: [тонакэваˮ, тодакэваˮ]
     тось+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2: [тонакэдаˮ, тодакэдаˮ]
     тось+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3: [тонакыˮ, тодакыˮ]
     тось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: тутадмʼ
     тось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: тутан
     тось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тута
     тось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: тутаниʼ
     тось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: тутадиʼ
     тось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тутӈахаʼ
     тось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: тутаваˮ
     тось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: тутадаˮ
     тось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тутаˮ
     
     тось+V+IV+InfImprf: това
     тось+V+IV+InfPrf: тоˮма
     тось+V+IV+PrcImprf: [тона, тода]
     тось+V+IV+PrcPrf: товы
     тось+V+IV+PrcFut: [тованда, товнда]
     тось+V+IV+PrcNeg: товдавэй
     тось+V+IV+Ger: тось
     тось+V+IV+GerFin: тованзь
     тось+V+IV+Evas+Abs: товоӈгад 
     тось+V+IV+ConNeg: туˮ
     тось+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: тутˮ
     
